Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 24 Lighting Equipment and Reflectors

31-24-1.
Times when lights required.

Every vehicle upon a highway within this state at any time from sunset to sunrise and at any other time when windshield wipers are in use, as a result of rain, sleet, snow, hail or other unfavorable atmospheric condition, or at any other time when there is not sufficient light or visibility, because of severe rain or any other condition, to clearly see persons and vehicles on the highway at a distance of five hundred feet (500´) ahead, shall display lighted lamps and illuminating devices as respectively required under this chapter for different classes of vehicles, subject to the exceptions given in this chapter with respect to parked vehicles.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-1

; P.L. 1982, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-2.
Means of measuring distance of visibility.

Whenever a requirement is declared in this chapter as to the distance from which certain lamps and devices shall render objects visible or within which the lamps or devices shall be visible, the provisions shall apply during the times stated in §

31-24-1

in respect to a vehicle without load when upon a straight, level, unlighted highway under normal atmospheric conditions unless a different time or condition is expressly stated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-2

.

31-24-3.
Measurement of height of lamps.

Whenever a requirement is declared in this chapter as to the mounted height of lamps or devices, it shall mean from the center of the lamp or device to the level ground upon which the vehicle stands when the vehicle is without a load.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-3

.

31-24-4.
Head lamps on vehicles other than cycles.

Every motor vehicle other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle shall be equipped with at least two (2) head lamps with at least one on each side of the front of the motor vehicle, and the head lamps shall comply with the requirements and limitations of this chapter. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 4; P.L. 1956, ch. 3846, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-4

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-5.
Head lamps on motorcycles and motor-driven cycles.

Every motor cycle and every motor-driven cycle shall be equipped with at least one and not more than two (2) head lamps which shall comply with the requirements and limitations of this chapter. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 4; P.L. 1956, ch. 3846, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-5

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-6.
Height of head lamps.

Every head lamp upon every motor vehicle, including every motorcycle and motor-driven cycle, shall be located at a height measured from the center of the head lamp of not more than fifty-four inches (54") nor less than twenty-four inches (24") to be measured as set forth in §

31-24-3

. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 4; P.L. 1956, ch. 3846, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-6

; P.L. 1957, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-7.
Tail lamps required.

Every motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, and pole trailer, and any other vehicle which is being drawn at the end of a train of vehicles, shall be equipped with at least one tail lamp mounted on the rear, which when lighted as required in this chapter, shall emit a red light plainly visible from a distance of five hundred feet (500´) to the rear, provided that in the case of a train of vehicles only the tail lamp on the rearmost vehicle need actually be seen from the distance specified. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-7

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-8.
Height of tail lamps.

Every tail lamp upon every vehicle shall be located at a height of not more than seventy-two inches (72") nor less than twenty inches (20") to be measured as set forth in §

31-24-3

. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-8

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-9.
Illumination of rear registration plate — Wiring of rear lights in connection with head lamps.

Either a tail lamp or a separate lamp shall be constructed and placed as to illuminate with a white light the rear registration plate and render it clearly legible from a distance of sixty feet (60´) to the rear. Any tail lamp or tail lamps, together with any separate lamp for illuminating the rear registration plate, shall be so wired as to be lighted whenever the head lamps or auxiliary driving lamps are lighted. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-9

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-10.
Rear reflectors required.

Every new motor vehicle sold and operated upon a highway, other than a truck tractor, shall carry on the rear, either as a part of the tail lamps or separately, two (2) red reflectors, except that every motorcycle and every motor-driven cycle shall carry at least one reflector, meeting the requirements of §

31-24-11

, and except that vehicles of the type mentioned in §

31-24-37

shall be equipped with reflectors. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-10

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-11.
Specifications for reflectors.

Every reflector referred to in §

31-24-10

shall be mounted on the vehicle at a height not less than twenty inches (20") nor more than sixty inches (60") measured as set forth in §

31-24-3

, and shall be of such size and characteristics and so mounted as to be visible at night from all distances within three hundred fifty feet (350´) from the vehicle when directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps, except that visibility from a greater distance is required by this chapter of reflectors on certain types of vehicles. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-11

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-12.
Stop lamps required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell any new motor vehicle, including any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, in this state, or for any person to drive a vehicle on the highways, unless it is equipped with a stop lamp meeting the requirements of §§

31-24-13

and

31-24-14

; provided, that all motor vehicles shall be equipped with stop lamps. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 7; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-12

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-13.
Stop and turn lamps authorized.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with, and when required under this chapter shall be equipped with, the following signal lamps or devices:

A stop lamp on the rear which shall emit a red or yellow light and which shall be actuated by applying the service (foot) brake and which may but need not be incorporated with a tail lamp;

A lamp or lamps or mechanical signal device capable of clearly indicating any intention to turn either to the right or to the left and which shall be visible both from the front and rear.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 18; P.L. 1950 (s. s.), ch. 2639, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-13

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-14.
Specifications for stop or signal lamps.

A stop lamp shall be plainly visible and understandable from a distance of one hundred feet (100´) to the rear both during normal sunlight and at nighttime, and a signal lamp or lamps indicating intention to turn shall be visible and understandable during daytime and nighttime from a distance of one hundred feet (100´) both to the front and rear. When a vehicle is equipped with a stop lamp or other signal lamps, the lamp or lamps shall at all times be maintained in good working condition. No stop lamp or signal lamp shall project a glaring or dazzling light. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 18; P.L. 1950 (s. s.), ch. 2639, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-14

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-15.
Mechanical signal devices self-illuminated.

All mechanical signal devices shall be self-illuminated when in use at the times mentioned in §

31-24-1

. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 18; P.L. 1950 (s. s.), ch. 2639, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-15

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-16.
Spot lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two (2) spot lamps and every lighted spot lamp shall be aimed and used upon approaching another vehicle so that no part of the high-intensity portion of the beam will be directed to the left of the prolongation of the extreme left side of the vehicle nor more than one hundred feet (100´) ahead of the vehicle. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-16

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-17.
Road lamps and fog lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two (2) road lamps or fog lamps which shall be rigidly affixed to the motor vehicle below the level of the head lamps, and shall be so aimed and used that no part of the high-intensity portion of the light beam shall rise more than eighteen inches (18") above the ground at a distance of seventy-five feet (75´) or more in front of the vehicle or be directed left of the prolongation of the extreme left side of the vehicle. Fog lamps and road lamps shall not be used in lieu of head lamps. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-17

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-18.
Side cowl and fender lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two (2) side cowl or fender lamps which shall emit an amber or white light without glare. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 18; P.L. 1950 (s. s.), ch. 2639, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-18

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-19.
Running board courtesy lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than one running board courtesy lamp on each side of it which shall emit a white or amber light without glare. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 18; P.L. 1950 (s. s.), ch. 2639, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-19

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-20.
Back up lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped without not more than two (2) back-up lamps either separately or in combination with other lamps, but no back-up lamp shall be lighted when the motor vehicle is in forward motion. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 18; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2639, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-20

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-21.
Lighting of farm tractors.

Every farm tractor equipped with an electric lighting system shall at all times mentioned in §

31-24-1

display a red tail lamp and either multiple beam or single beam head lamp equipment meeting the requirements of §§

31-24-7

—

31-24-9

,

31-24-22

, and

31-24-24

. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-21

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-22.
Multiple beam lamps required.

Except as provided in this chapter, the head lamps, or the auxiliary driving lamps, or combinations of them, on motor vehicles other than a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle, shall be arranged so that selection may be made between distributions of light projected to different elevations, subject to the following requirements and limitations:

There shall be an uppermost distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed and of such intensity as to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least three hundred fifty feet (350´) ahead for all conditions of loading.

There shall be a lowermost distribution of light, or composite beam so aimed and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least one hundred feet (100´) ahead; and under any condition of loading, none of the high-intensity portion of the beam shall be directed to strike the eyes of an approaching driver.

Every new motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, registered in this state, which has multiple beam road lighting equipment, shall be equipped with a beam indicator, which shall be lighted whenever the uppermost distribution of light from the head lamps is in use, and shall not otherwise be lighted. The indicator shall be so designed and located that when lighted it will be readily visible without glare to the driver of that vehicle.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 19; P.L. 1954, ch. 3291, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-22

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-23.
Use of multiple beam lamps.

Whenever a motor vehicle is being operated on a roadway or on its shoulder during the times specified in §

31-24-1

, the driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, directed high enough and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle, subject to the following requirements and limitations:

Whenever the driver of a vehicle approaches an oncoming vehicle within five hundred feet (500´), the driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed that the glaring rays are not projected into the eyes of the oncoming driver. The lowermost distribution of light, or composite beam, specified in subdivision (2) of §

31-24-22

, shall be deemed to avoid glare at all times, regardless of road contour and loading.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle follows another vehicle within two hundred feet (200´) to the rear, except when engaged in the act of overtaking and passing, the driver shall use a distribution of light permissible under this chapter other than the upper most distribution of light specified in subdivision (1) of §

31-24-22

.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 20; P.L. 1954, ch. 3291, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-23

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-24.
Single beam lamps.

Head lamps arranged to provide a single distribution of light shall be permitted on motor vehicles manufactured and sold prior to November 1, 1951, in lieu of multiple beam road lighting equipment specified in this chapter if the single distribution of light complies with the following requirements and limitations:

The head lamps shall be so aimed that when the vehicle is not loaded none of the high-intensity portion of the light shall, at a distance of twenty-five feet (25´) ahead, project higher than a level of five inches (5") below the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes, and in no case higher than forty-two inches (42") above the level on which the vehicle stands at a distance of seventy-five feet (75´) ahead.

The intensity shall be sufficient to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least two hundred feet (200´).

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-24

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-25.
Specifications for head lamps on motor-driven cycles.

The head or head lamps upon every motor-driven cycle may be of the single beam or multiple beam type but in either event shall comply with the requirements and limitations as follows:

Every head lamp or head lamps on a motor-driven cycle shall be of sufficient intensity to reveal a person or a vehicle at a distance of not less than one hundred feet (100´) when the motor driven cycle is operated at any speed less than twenty-five miles per hour (25 m.p.h.) and at a distance of not less than two hundred feet (200´) when the motor-driven cycle is operated at a speed of twenty-five (25) or more miles per hour, and the motor-driven cycle shall be subject to the speed limitations in §

31-14-10

.

In the event the motor-driven cycle is equipped with multiple beam head lamp or head lamps, the upper beam shall meet the minimum requirements set forth above and shall not exceed the limitations set forth in subdivision (1) of §

31-24-22

. The lowermost beam shall meet the requirements applicable to a lowermost distribution of light as set forth in subdivision (2) of §

31-24-22

.

In the event the motor-driven cycle is equipped with a single beam lamp or lamps, the lamp or lamps shall be so aimed that when the vehicle is loaded, none of the high-intensity portion of light, at a distance of twenty-five feet (25´) ahead, shall project higher than the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-25

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-26.
Head lamps of slow vehicles.

Any motor vehicle may be operated under the conditions specified in §

31-24-1

when equipped with two (2) lighted lamps upon the front of it capable of revealing persons and objects seventy-five feet (75´) ahead in lieu of lamps required in §§

31-24-22

or

31-24-24

; provided, that at no time shall it be operated at a speed in excess of twenty miles per hour (20 m.p.h.). Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-26

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-27.
Display of lighted lamps required.

At all times specified in §

31-24-1

, at least two (2) lighted lamps shall be displayed one on each side at the front of every motor vehicle other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, except when the vehicle is parked subject to the regulations governing lights on parked vehicles. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-27

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-28.
Maximum number of lamps lighted.

Whenever a motor vehicle equipped with head lamps as required by this chapter is also equipped with any auxiliary lamps or a spot lamp or any other lamp on the front of it projecting a beam of an intensity greater than three hundred (300) candle power, not more than a total of four (4) of the lamps on the front of a vehicle shall be lighted at any one time when upon a highway. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-28

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-29.
Maximum intensity of lights.

Any lighted lamp or illuminating device upon a motor vehicle other than head lamps, spot lamps, auxiliary lamps, or flashing front direction signals which projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than three hundred (300) candle power, shall be directed so that no part of the beam will strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than seventy-five feet (75´) from the vehicle. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-29

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-30.
Red lights in front prohibited.

No person shall drive or move any vehicle or equipment upon any highway with any lamp or device on it displaying a red light visible from directly in front of the center of it. This section shall not apply to any vehicle upon which a red light visible from the front is expressly authorized or required by chapters 1 — 27 of this title. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-30

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-31.
Flashing lights — Forward viewing or rotary beam lights.

Flashing lights are prohibited, except on an authorized emergency vehicle, school bus, snow-removal equipment, or on any vehicle as a means for indicating a right or left turn. However, the requirements of §

31-24-33

shall be deemed to be satisfied if the vehicle is equipped with lamps at the front mounted at the same level, displaying simultaneously flashing white or amber lights, and at the rear mounted at the same level, and displaying simultaneously flashing red lights, all of which lights shall be visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet (500´).

Forward viewing or rotating beam lights may be installed on and shall be restricted to the following categories of vehicles, and these lights shall be of color designated:

Emergency response vehicles of any fire, rescue, or ambulance department, fire chiefs, assistant fire chiefs, deputy chiefs, captains; any privately owned vehicle of any authorized volunteer member of a fire, rescue, or ambulance department; emergency management agency directors, assistant directors, assistant medical examiners and/or forensic pathologists of the office of state medical examiners; rescue vehicles, emergency response vehicles of the department of environmental management and the office of the state fire marshal; school buses; hospital emergency response vehicles; and two (2) American Red Cross disaster vehicles: Red, white and/or alternating flashing white;

Wrecker trucks, service station trucks, state and town safety and maintenance vehicles; snowplows and tractors; light company trucks, telephone company trucks, water company trucks, oil company trucks, and other utilities’ trucks; vehicles of television, radio and press photographers; newspaper motor route carriers; rural mail carriers; all motor-propelled vehicles owned by the Northern Rhode Island REACT (radio emergency associated citizens team); all motor-propelled vehicles owned by or under contract to the Rhode Island department of transportation when on official state business; and vehicles marking the beginning and end of funeral processions: Amber, provided, however, that wrecker and transportation vehicles operated pursuant to a public utilities commission license, and roadside assistance vehicles of any type operated for that purpose by the American Automobile Association shall be permitted to use flashing amber lights at the front and rear of the vehicle, to be activated only in the course of providing assistance to or transportation for a disabled vehicle. A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be charged for the issuance of a flashing lights permit to every vehicle identified in this subsection, with the exception of flashing lights permits issued to state, town or fire district safety and maintenance vehicles, which shall not be charged a fee.

Police units, state and local: Center rotating beam lights: Blue or red; Outboard mounted lights: Blue or red.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-31

; P.L. 1965, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 361, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 324, § 8; P.L. 1996, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 447, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121; P.L. 2003, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 7; P.L. 2018, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 90, § 1.

31-24-32.
Vehicles parked on lighted highways.

Whenever a vehicle is lawfully parked upon a street or highway during the hours between one-half (1/2) hour after sunset and one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise, and in the event there is sufficient light to reveal any person or object within a distance of five hundred feet (500´) upon the street or highway no lights need be displayed upon the parked vehicle. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-32

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-33.
Vehicles stopped on unlighted highways.

Whenever a vehicle is parked or stopped upon a roadway or shoulder adjacent to it, whether attended or unattended, during the hours between one-half (1/2) hour after sunset and one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise, and there is not sufficient light to reveal any person or object within a distance of five hundred feet (500´) upon the highway, the vehicle so parked or stopped shall be equipped with one or more lamps meeting the following requirements:

At least one lamp shall display a white or amber light visible from a distance of five hundred feet (500´) to the front of the vehicle;

The same lamp or at least one (1) other lamp shall display a red light visible from a distance of five hundred feet (500´) to the rear of the vehicle; and

The location of the lamp or lamps shall always be such that at least one lamp or combination of lamps meeting the requirements of this section is installed as near as practicable to the side of the vehicle which is closest to passing traffic.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a motor-driven cycle.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-33

; P.L. 1959, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-34.
Dimming of head lamps on parked vehicles.

Any lighted head lamps upon a parked vehicle shall be depressed or dimmed. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-34

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-35.
Lamps on animal-drawn, farm, and road vehicles.

All vehicles, including animal-drawn vehicles and including those referred to in §

31-23-3

not specifically required by this chapter to be equipped with lamps, shall at the times specified in §

31-24-1

be equipped with at least one lighted lamp or lantern exhibiting a white light visible from a distance of five hundred feet (500´) to the front of the vehicle and with a lamp or lantern exhibiting a red light visible from a distance of five hundred feet (500´) to the rear. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-35

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-36.
Vehicles requiring special lights and reflectors — Time of lighting.

Those sections of this chapter which follow immediately, including §§

31-24-37

—

31-24-44

, relating to clearance and marker lamps, reflectors, and stop lights, shall apply as stated in those sections to vehicles of the type enumerated in those sections, namely passenger buses, trucks, truck tractors, and certain trailers, semi-trailers, and pole trailers, respectively, when operated upon any highway. These vehicles shall be equipped as required, and all lamp equipment required shall be lighted at the times mentioned in §

31-24-1

, except that clearance and side marker lamps need not be lighted on the vehicle when operated within any municipality where there is sufficient light to render clearly discernible persons and vehicles on the highway at a distance of five hundred feet (500´). Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-36

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-37.
Clearance and marker lamps and reflectors.

In addition to other equipment required in chapters 1 — 27 of this title, the following vehicles shall be equipped as follows under the conditions stated in §

31-24-36

.

On every bus or truck, whatever its size, there shall be the following:

On the rear, two (2) reflectors, one at each side; and

On the rear, one stop light.

On every bus or truck eighty inches (80") or more in overall width, in addition to the requirements in subdivision (1) of this section:

On the front, two (2) clearance lamps, one at each side;

On the rear, two (2) clearance lamps, one at each side;

On each side, two (2) side marker lamps, one at or near the front and one at or near the rear;

On each side, two (2) reflectors, one at or near the front and one at or near the rear.

On every truck tractor:

On the front, two (2) clearance lamps, one at each side;

On the rear, one stop light.

On every trailer or semi-trailer having a gross weight in excess of three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.):

On the front, two (2) clearance lamps, one at each side;

On each side, two (2) side marker lamps, one at or near the front and one at or near the rear;

On each side, two (2) reflectors, one at or near the front and one at or near the rear;

On the rear, two (2) clearance lamps, one at each side;

On the rear, two (2) reflectors, one at each side; and

On the rear, one stop light.

On every pole trailer in excess of three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.) gross weight:

On each side, one side marker lamp and one clearance lamp which may be in combination, to show to the front, side, and rear.

On the rear of the pole trailer or load, two (2) reflectors, one at each side.

On every trailer, semi-trailer, or pole trailer weighing three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.) gross or less:

On the rear, two (2) reflectors, one on each side. If any trailer or semi-trailer is so loaded or is of such dimensions as to obscure the stop light on the towing vehicle, then the vehicle shall also be equipped with one stop light.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-37

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-38.
Color of clearance and marker lamps and reflectors.

Front clearance lamps and those marker lamps and reflectors mounted on the front or on the side near the front of a vehicle shall display or reflect an amber color.

Rear clearance lamps and those marker lamps and reflectors mounted on the rear or on the sides near the rear of a vehicle shall display or reflect a red color.

All lighting devices and reflectors mounted on the rear of any vehicle shall display or reflect a red color, except the stop light or other signal device, which may be red, amber, or yellow, and except that the light illuminating the license plate or the light emitted by a back up lamp shall be white.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-38

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-39.
Mounting of reflectors.

Reflectors. When required by §

31-24-37

, reflectors shall be mounted at a height not less than twenty-four inches (24") and not higher than sixty inches (60") above the ground on which the vehicle stands. If the highest part of the permanent structure of the vehicle is less than twenty-four inches (24") the reflector at that point shall be mounted as high as that part of the permanent structure will permit.

The rear reflectors on a pole trailer may be mounted on each side of the bolster or load.

Any required red reflector on the rear of a vehicle may be incorporated with the tail lamp, but the reflector shall meet all the other reflector requirements of this chapter.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-39

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-40.
Mounting of clearance and side marker lamps.

Clearance lamps shall be mounted on the permanent structure of the vehicle in such a manner as to indicate its extreme width and as near the top of the vehicle as practicable. Clearance lamps and side marker lamps may be mounted in combination, provided illumination is given as required in this section with reference to both. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-40

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-41.
Visibility of reflectors.

Every reflector upon any vehicle referred to in §

31-24-37

shall be of a size, have characteristics, and be maintained so as to be readily visible at nighttime from all distances from fifty feet (50´) to five hundred feet (500´) from the vehicle when directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps. Reflectors required to be mounted on the sides of the vehicle shall reflect the required color of light to the sides, and those mounted on the rear shall reflect a red color to the rear. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-41

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-42.
Visibility of front and rear clearance lamps.

Front and rear clearance lamps shall be capable of being seen and distinguished under normal atmospheric conditions at the times lights are required at a distance of five hundred feet (500´) from the front and rear, respectively, of the vehicle. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-42

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-43.
Visibility of side marker lamps.

Side marker lamps shall be capable of being seen and distinguished under normal atmospheric conditions at the times lights are required at a distance of five hundred feet (500´) from the side of the vehicle on which they are mounted. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-43

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-44.
Obstructed lights not required.

Whenever motor and other vehicles are operated in combination during the time that lights are required, any lamp (except tail lamps) need not be lighted which, by reason of its location on a vehicle of the combination, would be obscured by another vehicle of the combination. This shall not affect the requirement that lighted clearance lamps be displayed on the front of the foremost vehicle required to have clearance lamps, nor that all lights required on the rear of the rearmost vehicle of any combination shall be lighted. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-44

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-45.
Projecting loads.

Whenever the load upon any vehicle extends to the rear or front four feet (4´) or more beyond the bed or body of the vehicle, there shall be displayed at the extreme rear end or front of the load, at the time specified in §

31-24-1

, a red light or lantern plainly visible from a distance of at least five hundred feet (500´) to the sides, rear and front. The red light or lantern required under this section shall be in addition to the red rear light required upon every vehicle. At any other time there shall be displayed at the extreme rear or front end of such load a red flag or cloth not less than twelve inches (12") square and so hung that the entire area is visible to the driver of a vehicle approaching from either direction. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 14; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-45

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-46.
Lights on snow removal equipment.

The state traffic commission shall adopt standards and specifications applicable to head lamps, clearance lamps, identification, and other lamps on snow removal equipment when operated on the highways of this state in lieu of the lamps otherwise required on motor vehicles by this chapter. The standards and specifications may permit the use of flashing lights for purposes of identification on snow removal equipment when in service upon the highways.

It shall be unlawful to operate any snow removal equipment on any highway unless the lamps on it comply with and are lighted when and as required by the standards and specifications adopted as provided in this section.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-46

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.

31-24-47.
Regulation and certification of lighting devices.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to approve or disapprove lighting devices and to issue and enforce regulations establishing standards and specifications for the approval of such lighting devices, their installation, and aiming. The regulations shall correlate with and, so far as possible, conform to the current standards and specifications of the society of automotive engineers applicable to the equipment.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is required to approve or disapprove any lighting device, of a type on which approval is specifically required in this chapter, within a reasonable time after the device has been submitted.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to set up the procedure which shall be followed when any device is submitted for approval.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles upon approving a lamp or device, shall issue to the applicant a certificate of approval together with any instructions determined by him or her.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall publish lists of all lamps and devices by name and type which have been approved by him or her.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 34, § 28; P.L. 1954, ch. 3291, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-24-47

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 121.